Idaho statutes. Title 74 TRANSPARENT AND ETHICAL GOVERNMENT
Chapter 1
PUBLIC RECORDS ACT

Sec.

§ 74-101. Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Applicant” means any person formally seeking a paid or volunteer position with a public agency. “Applicant” does not include any person seeking appointment to a position normally filled by election.

“Copy” means transcribing by handwriting, photocopying, duplicating machine and reproducing by any other means so long as the public record is not altered or damaged.

“Custodian” means the person or persons having personal custody and control of the public records in question.

“Independent public body corporate and politic” means the Idaho housing and finance association as created in chapter 62, title 67, Idaho Code.

“Inspect” means the right to listen, view and make notes of public records as long as the public record is not altered or damaged.

“Investigatory record” means information with respect to an identifiable person, group of persons or entities compiled by a public agency or independent public body corporate and politic pursuant to its statutory authority in the course of investigating a specific act, omission, failure to act, or other conduct over which the public agency or independent public body corporate and politic has regulatory authority or law enforcement authority.

“Law enforcement agency” means any state or local agency given law enforcement powers or which has authority to investigate, enforce, prosecute or punish violations of state or federal criminal statutes, ordinances or regulations.

“Local agency” means a county, city, school district, municipal corporation, district, public health district, political subdivision, or any agency thereof, or any committee of a local agency, or any combination thereof.

“Person” means any natural person, corporation, partnership, firm, association, joint venture, state or local agency or any other recognized legal entity.

“Prisoner” means a person who has been convicted of a crime and is either incarcerated or on parole for that crime or who is being held in custody for trial or sentencing.

“Public agency” means any state or local agency as defined in this section.

“Public official” means any state, county, local district, independent public body corporate and politic or governmental official or employee, whether elected, appointed or hired.

“Public record” includes, but is not limited to, any writing containing information relating to the conduct or administration of the public’s business prepared, owned, used or retained by any state agency, independent public body corporate and politic or local agency regardless of physical form or characteristics. Provided, however, that personal notes created by a public official solely for his own use shall not be a public record as long as such personal notes are not shared with any other person or entity.

“Requester” means the person requesting examination and/or copying of public records pursuant to section 74-102, Idaho Code.

“State agency” means every state officer, department, division, bureau, commission and board or any committee of a state agency including those in the legislative or judicial branch, except the state militia and the Idaho state historical society library and archives.

§ 74-102. Public records — Right to examine.

Every person has a right to examine and take a copy of any public record of this state and there is a presumption that all public records in Idaho are open at all reasonable times for inspection except as otherwise expressly provided by statute.

The right to copy public records shall include the right to make photographs or photographic or other copies while the records are in the possession of the custodian of the records using equipment provided by the public agency or independent public body corporate and politic or using equipment designated by the custodian.

Additionally, the custodian of any public record shall give the person, on demand, a certified copy of it if the record is of a nature permitting such copying or shall furnish reasonable opportunity to inspect or copy such record.

A public agency or independent public body corporate and politic may require that a request for public records be submitted to it in a writing that specifically describes the subject matter and records sought, including a specific date range for when the records sought were created. The requesting party shall be as specific as possible when requesting records. A request shall describe records sought in sufficient detail to enable the public body to locate such records with reasonable effort. A request shall also provide the requester’s name, mailing address, e-mail address and telephone number. A request for public records and delivery of the public records may be made by electronic mail.

The custodian shall make no inquiry of any person who requests a public record, except:

To verify the identity of the requester in accordance with section 74-113, Idaho Code; or

To ensure that the requested record or information will not be used for purposes of a mailing or telephone list prohibited by section 74-120, Idaho Code, or as otherwise provided by law; or

As required for purposes of protecting personal information from disclosure under chapter 2, title 49, Idaho Code, and federal law.

For providing a duplicate of a computer tape, computer disc, microfilm or similar or analogous record system containing public record information, a public agency or independent public body corporate and politic or public official may charge a fee, uniform to all persons that does not exceed the sum of the following:

Fees shall not exceed reasonable labor costs necessarily incurred in responding to a public records request. Fees, if charged, shall reflect the personnel and quantity of time that are reasonably necessary to process a request. Fees for labor costs shall be charged at the per hour pay rate of the lowest paid administrative staff employee or public official of the public agency or independent public body corporate and politic who is necessary and qualified to process the request. If a request requires redactions to be made by an attorney who is employed by the public agency or independent public body corporate and politic, the rate charged shall be no more than the per hour rate of the lowest paid attorney within the public agency or independent public body corporate and politic who is necessary and qualified to process the public records request. If a request is submitted to a public agency or independent public body corporate and politic that does not have an attorney on staff, and requires redactions by an attorney, the rate shall be no more than the usual and customary rate of the attorney who is retained by the public agency or independent public body corporate and politic for that purpose.

The public agency or independent public body corporate and politic shall not charge any cost or fee for copies or labor when the requester demonstrates that the requester’s examination and/or copying of public records:

The custodian shall not review, examine or scrutinize any copy, photograph or memoranda in the possession of any such person and shall extend to the person all reasonable comfort and facility for the full exercise of the right granted under this act.

Nothing herein contained shall prevent the custodian from maintaining such vigilance as is required to prevent alteration of any public record while it is being examined.

Examination of public records under the authority of this section must be conducted during regular office or working hours unless the custodian shall authorize examination of records in other than regular office or working hours. In this event, the persons designated to represent the custodian during such examination shall be entitled to reasonable compensation to be paid to them by the public agency or independent public body corporate and politic having custody of such records, out of funds provided in advance by the person examining such records, at other than regular office or working hours.

The public agency or independent public body corporate and politic may provide the requester information to help the requester narrow the scope of the request or to help the requester make the request more specific when the response to the request is likely to be voluminous or require payment as provided in subsection (10) of this section.
(10)(a) Except for fees that are authorized or prescribed under other provisions of Idaho law, no fee shall be charged for the first two (2) hours of labor in responding to a request for public records, or for copying the first one hundred (100) pages of paper records that are requested.

The request is for more than one hundred (100) pages of paper records; or

The request includes records from which nonpublic information must be deleted; or

The actual labor associated with responding to requests for public records in compliance with the provisions of this chapter exceeds two (2) person hours.

The agency’s direct cost of copying the information in that form;

The standard cost, if any, for selling the same information in the form of a publication;

The agency’s cost of conversion, or the cost of conversion charged by a third party, if the existing electronic record is converted to another electronic form.

Is likely to contribute significantly to the public’s understanding of the operations or activities of the government;

Is not primarily in the individual interest of the requester including, but not limited to, the requester’s interest in litigation in which the requester is or may become a party; and

Will not occur if fees are charged because the requester has insufficient financial resources to pay such fees.
(g) Statements of fees by a public agency or independent public body corporate and politic shall be itemized to show the per page costs for copies, and hourly rates of employees and attorneys involved in responding to the request, and the actual time spent on the public records request. No lump sum costs shall be assigned to any public records request.

(b) A public agency or independent public body corporate and politic or public official may establish fees to recover the actual labor and copying costs associated with locating and copying documents if:

(c) A public agency or independent public body corporate and politic or public official may establish a copying fee schedule. The fee may not exceed the actual cost to the agency of copying the record if another fee is not otherwise provided by law.

(11) A requester may not file multiple requests for public records solely to avoid payment of fees. When a public agency or independent public body corporate and politic reasonably believes that one (1) or more requesters is segregating a request into a series of requests to avoid payment of fees authorized pursuant to this section, the public agency or independent public body corporate and politic may aggregate such requests and charge the appropriate fees. The public agency or independent public body corporate and politic may consider the time period in which the requests have been made in its determination to aggregate the related requests. A public agency or independent public body corporate and politic shall not aggregate multiple requests on unrelated subjects from one (1) requester.

(12) The custodian may require advance payment of fees authorized by this section. Any money received by the public agency or independent public body corporate and politic shall be credited to the account for which the expense being reimbursed was or will be charged, and such funds may be expended by the agency as part of its appropriation from that fund. Any portion of an advance payment in excess of the actual costs of labor and copying incurred by the agency in responding to the request shall be returned to the requester.

(13) A public agency or independent public body corporate and politic shall not prevent the examination or copying of a public record by contracting with a nongovernmental body to perform any of its duties or functions.

(14) Nothing contained herein shall prevent a public agency or independent public body corporate and politic from disclosing statistical information that is descriptive of an identifiable person or persons, unless prohibited by law.

(15) Nothing contained herein shall prevent a public agency or independent public body corporate and politic from providing a copy of a public record in electronic form if the record is available in electronic form and if the person specifically requests an electronic copy.

(16) A public agency, elected official or independent public body corporate and politic shall designate a custodian or custodians for all public records, which includes any public official having custody of, control of, or authorized access to public records and also includes all delegates of such officials, employees or representatives.

§ 74-103. Response to request for examination of public records.

A public agency or independent public body corporate and politic shall either grant or deny a person’s request to examine or copy public records within three (3) working days of the date of the receipt of the request for examination or copying. If it is determined by employees of the public agency or independent public body corporate and politic that a longer period of time is needed to locate or retrieve the public records, the public agency or independent public body corporate and politic shall so notify in writing the person requesting to examine or copy the records and shall provide the public records to the person no later than ten (10) working days following the person’s request. Provided however, if it is determined the existing electronic record requested will first have to be converted to another electronic format by the agency or by a third party and that such conversion cannot be completed within ten (10) working days, the agency shall so notify in writing the person requesting to examine or copy the records. The agency shall provide the converted public record at a time mutually agreed upon between the agency and the requester, with due consideration given to any limitations that may exist due to the process of conversion or due to the use of a third party to make the conversion.

If the public agency or independent public body corporate and politic fails to respond, the request shall be deemed to be denied within ten (10) working days following the request.

If the public agency or independent public body corporate and politic denies the person’s request for examination or copying the public records or denies in part and grants in part the person’s request for examination and copying of the public records, the person legally responsible for administering the public agency or independent public body corporate and politic or that person’s designee shall notify the person in writing of the denial or partial denial of the request for the public record.

The notice of denial or partial denial shall state that the attorney for the public agency or independent public body corporate and politic has reviewed the request or shall state that the public agency or independent public body corporate and politic has had an opportunity to consult with an attorney regarding the request for examination or copying of a record and has chosen not to do so. The notice of denial or partial denial also shall indicate the statutory authority for the denial and indicate clearly the person’s right to appeal the denial or partial denial and the time periods for doing so.

§ 74-104. Records exempt from disclosure — Exemptions in federal or state law — Court files of judicial proceedings.

The following records are exempt from disclosure:

Any public record exempt from disclosure by federal or state law or federal regulations to the extent specifically provided for by such law or regulation.

Records contained in court files of judicial proceedings, the disclosure of which is prohibited by or under rules adopted by the Idaho supreme court, but only to the extent that confidentiality is provided under such rules, and any drafts or other working memoranda related to judicial decision-making, provided the provisions of this subsection making records exempt from disclosure shall not apply to the extent that such records or information contained in those records are necessary for a background check on an individual that is required by federal law regulating the sale of firearms, guns or ammunition.

§ 74-105. Records exempt from disclosure — Law enforcement records, investigatory records of agencies, evacuation and emergency response plans, worker’s compensation.

The following records are exempt from disclosure:

Investigatory records of a law enforcement agency, as defined in section 74-101(7), Idaho Code, under the conditions set forth in section 74-124, Idaho Code.

Juvenile records of a person maintained pursuant to chapter 5, title 20, Idaho Code, except that facts contained in such records shall be furnished upon request in a manner determined by the court to persons and governmental and private agencies and institutions conducting pertinent research studies or having a legitimate interest in the protection, welfare and treatment of the juvenile who is thirteen (13) years of age or younger. If the juvenile is petitioned or charged with an offense which would be a criminal offense if committed by an adult, the name, offense of which the juvenile was petitioned or charged and disposition of the court shall be subject to disclosure as provided in section 20-525, Idaho Code. Additionally, facts contained in any records of a juvenile maintained under chapter 5, title 20, Idaho Code, shall be furnished upon request to any school district where the juvenile is enrolled or is seeking enrollment.

Records of the custody review board of the Idaho department of juvenile corrections, including records containing the names, addresses and written statements of victims and family members of juveniles, shall be exempt from public disclosure pursuant to section 20-533A, Idaho Code.

The following records of the department of correction:
(4)(a) The following records of the department of correction:

Records of which the public interest in confidentiality, public safety, security and habilitation clearly outweighs the public interest in disclosure as identified pursuant to the authority of the Idaho board of correction under section 20-212, Idaho Code;

Records that contain any identifying information, or any information that would lead to the identification of any victims or witnesses;

Records that reflect future transportation or movement of a prisoner;

Records gathered during the course of the presentence investigation;

Records of a prisoner, as defined in section 74-101(10), Idaho Code, or probationer shall not be disclosed to any other prisoner or probationer.

A date of birth in substantially the following format: “XX/XX/birth year”;

The last four (4) digits of a financial account number in substantially the following format: “XXXXX1234”;

The last four (4) digits of a driver’s license number or state-issued personal identification card number in substantially the following format: “XXXXX350F”; and

The last four (4) digits of an employer identification number or business’s taxpayer identification number.

Records, other than public expenditure records, related to proposed or existing critical infrastructure held by or in the custody of any public agency only when the disclosure of such information is reasonably likely to jeopardize the safety of persons, property or the public safety. Such records may include emergency evacuation, escape or other emergency response plans, vulnerability assessments, operation and security manuals, plans, blueprints or security codes. For purposes of this paragraph, “system” includes electrical, computer and telecommunication systems, electric power (including production, generating, transportation, transmission and distribution), heating, ventilation, and air conditioning. For purposes of this subsection, “critical infrastructure” means any system or asset, whether physical or virtual, so vital to the state of Idaho, including its political subdivisions, that the incapacity or destruction of such system or asset would have a debilitating impact on state or national economic security, state or national public health or safety or any combination of those matters.

Records of the commission of pardons and parole shall be exempt from public disclosure pursuant to section 20-213A, Idaho Code, and section 20-223, Idaho Code. Records exempt from disclosure shall also include those containing the names, addresses and written statements of victims.
(5) Voting records of the sexual offender management board. The written record of the vote to classify an offender as a violent sexual predator by each board member in each case reviewed by that board member shall be exempt from disclosure to the public and shall be made available upon request only to the governor, the chairman of the senate judiciary and rules committee, and the chairman of the house of representatives judiciary, rules and administration committee, for all lawful purposes.

To employers and prospective employers not subject to the provisions of the Americans with disabilities act, 42 U.S.C. 12112, or other statutory limitations, provided the employer presents a written authorization from the person to whom the records pertain; or

To others who demonstrate that the public interest in allowing inspection and copying of such records outweighs the public or private interest in maintaining the confidentiality of such records, as determined by a civil court of competent jurisdiction; or

Although a claimant’s records maintained by the industrial commission, including medical and rehabilitation records, are otherwise exempt from public disclosure, the quoting or discussing of medical or rehabilitation records contained in the industrial commission’s records during a hearing for compensation or in a written decision issued by the industrial commission shall be permitted; provided further, the true identification of the parties shall not be exempt from public disclosure in any written decision issued and released to the public by the industrial commission.

(6) Records of the sheriff or Idaho state police received or maintained pursuant to sections 18-3302, 18-3302H and 18-3302K, Idaho Code, relating to an applicant or licensee except that any law enforcement officer and law enforcement agency, whether inside or outside the state of Idaho, may access information maintained in the license record system as set forth in section 18-3302K(16), Idaho Code.

(7) Records of investigations prepared by the department of health and welfare pursuant to its statutory responsibilities dealing with the protection of children, the rehabilitation of youth, adoptions and the commitment of mentally ill persons. For reasons of health and safety, best interests of the child or public interest, the department of health and welfare may provide for the disclosure of records of investigations associated with actions pursuant to the provisions of chapter 16, title 16, Idaho Code, prepared by the department of health and welfare pursuant to its statutory responsibilities dealing with the protection of children except any such records regarding adoptions shall remain exempt from disclosure.

(8) Records including, but not limited to, investigative reports, resulting from investigations conducted into complaints of discrimination made to the Idaho human rights commission unless the public interest in allowing inspection and copying of such records outweighs the legitimate public or private interest in maintaining confidentiality of such records. A person may inspect and copy documents from an investigative file to which he or she is a named party if such documents are not otherwise prohibited from disclosure by federal law or regulation or state law. The confidentiality of this subsection will no longer apply to any record used in any judicial proceeding brought by a named party to the complaint or investigation, or by the Idaho human rights commission, relating to the complaint of discrimination.

(9) Records containing information obtained by the manager of the Idaho state insurance fund pursuant to chapter 9, title 72, Idaho Code, from or on behalf of employers or employees contained in underwriting and claims for benefits files.

(10) The worker’s compensation records of the Idaho industrial commission provided that the industrial commission shall make such records available:

(a) To the parties in any worker’s compensation claim and to the industrial special indemnity fund of the state of Idaho; or

(b) To employers and prospective employers subject to the provisions of the Americans with disabilities act, 42 U.S.C. 12112, or other statutory limitations, who certify that the information is being requested with respect to a worker to whom the employer has extended an offer of employment and will be used in accordance with the provisions of the Americans with disabilities act, 42 U.S.C. 12112, or other statutory limitations; or

(11) Records of investigations compiled by the commission on aging involving vulnerable adults, as defined in section 18-1505, Idaho Code, alleged to be abused, neglected or exploited.

(12) Criminal history records and fingerprints, as defined in section 67-3001, Idaho Code, and compiled by the Idaho state police. Such records shall be released only in accordance with chapter 30, title 67, Idaho Code.

(13) Records furnished or obtained pursuant to section 41-1019, Idaho Code, regarding termination of an appointment, employment, contract or other insurance business relationship between an insurer and a producer.

(14) Records of a prisoner or former prisoner in the custody of any state or local correctional facility, when the request is made by another prisoner in the custody of any state or local correctional facility.

(15) Except as provided in section 72-1007, Idaho Code, records of the Idaho industrial commission relating to compensation for crime victims under chapter 10, title 72, Idaho Code.

(16) Records or information identifying a complainant maintained by the department of health and welfare pursuant to section 39-3556, Idaho Code, relating to certified family homes, unless the complainant consents in writing to the disclosure or the disclosure of the complainant’s identity is required in any administrative or judicial proceeding.

(17) Records of any certification or notification required by federal law to be made in connection with the acquisition or transfer of a firearm, including a firearm as defined in 26 U.S.C. 5845(a).

(18) The following records of the state public defense commission:

(a) Records containing information protected or exempted from disclosure under the rules adopted by the Idaho supreme court, attorney work product, attorney-client privileged communication, records containing confidential information from an individual about his criminal case or performance of his attorney, or confidential information about an inquiry into an attorney’s fitness to represent indigent defendants.

(b) Records related to the administration of the extraordinary litigation fund by the state public defense commission, pursuant to section 19-850(2)(e), Idaho Code, to the extent that such records contain information protected or exempted from disclosure under rules adopted by the Idaho supreme court, attorney work product or attorney-client privileged communication. This exemption does not include the amount awarded based upon an application for extraordinary litigation funds.